static/hunspell/03.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O48 Y 332 # N09 Der/дағы+
SFX O48 0 лар .	+Pl
SFX O48 0 лармы .	+Pl+Q
SFX O48 0 ларҙыр .	+Pl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ларсы .	+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ның .	+Gen
SFX O48 0 ға .	+Dat
SFX O48 0 ны .	+Acc
SFX O48 0 нан .	+Abl
SFX O48 0 нда .	+Loc
SFX O48 0 ныңмы .	+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 ғамы .	+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 нымы .	+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 нанмы .	+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 ндамы .	+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 ныңдыр .	+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғалыр .	+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 нылыр .	+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 нандыр .	+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ндалыр .	+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныңсы .	+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғасы .	+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 нысы .	+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 нансы .	+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ндасы .	+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 м .	+PxSg1
SFX O48 0 ң .	+PxSg2
SFX O48 0 һы .	+PxSg3
SFX O48 0 быҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX O48 0 ғыҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX O48 0 мдың .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX O48 0 ңдың .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX O48 0 һының .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX O48 0 быҙҙың .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙың .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX O48 0 ма .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX O48 0 ңа .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX O48 0 һына .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX O48 0 быҙға .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX O48 0 ғыҙға .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX O48 0 мды .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX O48 0 ңды .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX O48 0 һын .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX O48 0 быҙҙы .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙы .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX O48 0 мдан .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX O48 0 ңдан .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX O48 0 һынан .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX O48 0 быҙҙан .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙан .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX O48 0 мда .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX O48 0 ңда .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX O48 0 һында .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX O48 0 быҙҙа .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙа .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX O48 0 мдыңмы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыңмы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныңмы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 мамы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 ңамы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 һынамы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙғамы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙғамы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 мдымы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдымы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 һынмы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙымы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙымы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 мданмы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 ңданмы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 һынанмы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙанмы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙанмы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 мдамы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдамы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 һындамы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙамы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙамы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыңмылыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныңмылыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 мамылыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңамылыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 һынамылыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙғамылыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙғамылыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдымылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдымылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 һынмылыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 мданмылыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңданмылыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 һынанмылыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдамылыр .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдамылыр .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 һындамылыр .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыңдыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыңдыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныңдыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 малыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңалыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыналыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙғалыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙғалыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 һындыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдандыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдандыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 һынандыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙандыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙандыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдалыр .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдалыр .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 һындалыр .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙалыр .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙалыр .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыңсы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыңсы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныңсы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 масы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңасы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һынасы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙғасы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙғасы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдысы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдысы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һынсы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙысы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙысы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдансы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдансы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һынансы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙансы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙансы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдасы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдасы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һындасы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙасы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙасы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ммы .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX O48 0 ңмы .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX O48 0 һымы .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙмы .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙмы .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX O48 0 ммылыр .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 һымылыр .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыр .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыр .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX O48 0 һылыр .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыр .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыр .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX O48 0 мсы .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңсы .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һысы .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙсы .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙсы .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдыҡы .	+PxSg1+Poss
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡы .	+PxSg2+Poss
SFX O48 0 һыныҡы .	+PxSg3+Poss
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡы .	+PxPl1+Poss
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡы .	+PxPl2+Poss
SFX O48 0 мдыҡының .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡының .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen
SFX O48 0 һыныҡының .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡының .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡының .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen
SFX O48 0 мдыҡыға .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡыға .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat
SFX O48 0 һыныҡыға .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыға .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡыға .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat
SFX O48 0 мдыҡыны .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡыны .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 һыныҡыны .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыны .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡыны .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынан .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынан .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынан .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынан .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынан .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 мдыҡында .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡында .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc
SFX O48 0 һыныҡында .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыда .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡында .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc
SFX O48 0 мдыҡыныңмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡыныңмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныҡыныңмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыныңмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡыныңмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынамы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынанмы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынанмы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынанмы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынанмы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынанмы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыҡындамы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡында .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныҡындамы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡындамы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡындамы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыҡыныңедыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡыныңдыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныҡыныңдыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыныңдыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡыныңдыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыҡыналыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡыналыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныҡыналыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыналыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡыналыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыҡындыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡындыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныҡындыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡындыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡындыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынандыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынандыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынандыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынандыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынандыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыҡындалыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡындалыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныҡындалыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡындалыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡындалыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыҡыныңсы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡыныңсы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныҡыныңсы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡыныңсы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡыныңсы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынсы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынсы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынсы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынсы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынсы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдыҡынансы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡынансы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныҡынансы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡынансы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡынансы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдыҡындасы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡындасы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныҡындасы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡындасы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡындасы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мдыҡымы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Q
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡымы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Q
SFX O48 0 һыныҡымы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Q
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡымы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Q
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡымы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Q
SFX O48 0 мдыҡылыр .	+PxSg1+Poss+Indf
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡылыр .	+PxSg2+Poss+Indf
SFX O48 0 һыныҡылыр .	+PxSg3+Poss+Indf
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡылыр .	+PxPl1+Poss+Indf
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡылыр .	+PxPl2+Poss+Indf
SFX O48 0 мдыҡысы .	+PxSg1+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ңдыҡысы .	+PxSg2+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 һыныҡысы .	+PxSg3+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 быҙҙыҡысы .	+PxPl1+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ғыҙҙыҡысы .	+PxPl2+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 мы .	+Q
SFX O48 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 лыр .	+Indf
SFX O48 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ныҡы .	+Poss
SFX O48 0 ныҡының .	+Poss+Gen
SFX O48 0 ныҡыға .	+Poss+Dat
SFX O48 0 ныҡыны .	+Poss+Acc
SFX O48 0 ныҡынан .	+Poss+Abl
SFX O48 0 ныҡында .	+Poss+Loc
SFX O48 0 ныҡыныңмы .	+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O48 0 ныҡынамы .	+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O48 0 ныҡынмы .	+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O48 0 ныҡынанмы .	+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O48 0 ныҡындамы .	+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O48 0 ныҡыныңдыр .	+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныҡыналыр .	+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныҡындыр .	+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныҡынандыр .	+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныҡындалыр .	+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныҡыныңсы .	+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ныҡынасы .	+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ныҡынсы .	+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ныҡынансы .	+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ныҡындасы .	+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 ныҡымы .	+Poss+Q
SFX O48 0 ныҡылыр .	+Poss+Indf
SFX O48 0 ныҡысы .	+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 лай .	+Der/дай
SFX O48 0 са .	+Der/са
SFX O48 0 лаймы .	+Der/дай+Q
SFX O48 0 самы .	+Der/са+Q
SFX O48 0 лаймылыр .	+Der/дай+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 самылыр .	+Der/са+Q+Indf
SFX O48 0 лайҙыр .	+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O48 0 салыр .	+Der/са+Indf
SFX O48 0 лайсы .	+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O48 0 сасы .	+Der/са+Clt/сы
